RHVoice/src/scripts/Uzbek/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2023 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

source graphemes.foma
define Unit 
%0:"nol" |
1:"bir" |
2:"ikki" |
3:"uch" |
4:"to'rt" |
5:"besh" |
6:"olti" |
7:"yetti" |
8:"sakkiz" |
9:"to'qqiz" ;

define Teen 
1:["o'n" "bir"] |
2:["o'n" "ikki"] |
3:["o'n" "uch"] |
4:["o'n" "to'rt"] |
5:["o'n" "besh"] |
6:["o'n" "olti"] |
7:["o'n" "yetti"] |
8:["o'n" "sakkiz"] |
9:["o'n" "to'qqiz"];

define Ten 
1:"o'n" |
2:"yigirma" |
3:"o'ttiz" |
4:"qirq" |
5:"ellik" |
6:"oltmish" |
7:"yetmish" |
8:"sakson" |
9:"to'qson" ;

define OrdUnit 
%0:"nolinchi" |
1:"birinchi" |
2:"ikkinchi" |
3:"uchinchi" |
4:"to'rtinchi" |
5:"beshinchi" |
6:"oltinchi" |
7:"yettinchi" |
8:"sakkizinchi" |
9:"to'qqizinchi" ;

define OrdTeen 
1:["o'n" "birinchi"] |
2:["o'n" "ikkinchi"] |
3:["o'n" "uchinchi"] |
4:["o'n" "to'rtinchi"] |
5:["o'n" "beshinchi"] |
6:["o'n" "oltinchi"] |
7:["o'n" "yettinchi"] |
8:["o'n" "sakkizinchi"] |
9:["o'n" "to'qqizinchi"] ;

define OrdTen 
1:"o'ninchi" |
2:"yigirmanchi" |
3:"o'ttizinchi" |
4:"qirqinchi" |
5:"ellikinchi" |
6:"oltmishinchi" |
7:"yetmishinchi" |
8:"saksoninchi" |
9:"to'qsoninchi" ;

define TenOrHundredSymbol ten|hnd ; 


# ----------------------------
define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Digit %0|NZDigit ; 


define UnformattedNumber %0 | [NZDigit Digit^<15] ; 
define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%. Digit^3]^{1,4} ; 
define RegularDecimal [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] %, Digit+;   #  3.000.320(,022)
define ForeignDecimal UnformattedNumber %. [Digit^<3 | Digit^>3];   # foreign DP 1.02
define Ordinal	[FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber]  OrdSuffix ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker
define ArabicNumber UnformattedNumber | FormattedNumber | RegularDecimal | ForeignDecimal | Ordinal;

# tag valid numbers
define tagNumberTypes 
  [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%, Digit+)  .#. ,,  #  3.000.320(,022)
  # UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. Digit+)  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
  UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. [Digit^{1,2} | Digit^>3])  .#. ,,     # foreign DP 1.02
  [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum ord || .#. _  OrdSuffix .#. ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker

# We expect this code to be protected from strings contain other than digits, commas and periods.
# We will, however, catch non-numbers which has slipped through, like  20.0.1  or 20,11,111
define tagCascade [  
	[%,|%.] @->  [hndths dp] || wnum  _ Digit Digit .#. ,,    # place decimal point after whole numbers
	[%,|%.] @->  [tenths dp] || wnum  _ Digit .#.  ,, 
	[%,|%.] @-> ...  dp || wnum  _ Digit^>2 .#. ]    
   .o. [ [%.]:0  -> || _ ?* wnum ]  #  get rid of the thousands dividers
  .o. [ Digit -> ... dec  || dp Digit* _ .#. ]  # mark decimal
  .o. [ dec -> wnum || dp NZDigit Digit^<3 _ .#. ]  # See (1) below, "Un-Decimalize"
  .o. [ Digit -> ... wnum || [.#. | \Digit] Digit* _ [ .#. | %. | %, ]];    #  not a whole number, or decimal


define tagRules  tagNumberTypes .o. tagCascade; 

# For whole numbers change the markers for singles
define preTranslate [1 thns] -> [1 thn] || _ ,,
  [1 mlns] -> [1 mln] || _ ,,
  [1 blns] -> [1 bln] || _ ,,
  [1 tlns] -> [1 tln] || _ ;
#----------------------------

define PowerOfThousandSymbol thns|mlns|blns|tlns|thn|mln|bln|tln ; 
define PowerOfTenSymbol TenOrHundredSymbol|PowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

# define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 wnum  ; 
 define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 [\dec & \Digit]  ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular [mlns:mln|blns:bln|tlns:tln] -> || [[PowerOfThousandSymbol (and)]|wnum] 1 _ ; 

define RemoveSilentGroups %0^3 (PowerOfThousandSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum ; 

define SeparateHundreds [..] -> hnd ||  Digit _ Digit^2 ?* wnum; 

define Mark100s hnd -> hnd0 || 1 _ {00} ; 

define SeparateTens [..] -> ten ||  Digit _ Digit ?* wnum; 


define RemoveZeros %0  (TenOrHundredSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum |.#.; 

define MarkTeens [[1 ten]:0] NZDigit [0:[teen %0]] -> ; 

define InsertAnds [..] -> and || 
 [.#.|dp] \dp+ _ NZDigit [ [PowerOfThousandSymbol|hnd|teen|ten] %0]* [PowerOfThousandSymbol|hnd|teen|ten|wnum]  ; # puts a single 'and', before the last non-zero element

define RemoveBirMing 1 -> 0 || .#. _ thn wnum ; 

define processOrdinals 
 [
 OrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord OrdSuffix .#. ,,
 [OrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord OrdSuffix .#. ,,
 [OrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord OrdSuffix .#. 
  ];


define processFinalOrdinals 
 [yuz:yuzinchi | ming:minginchi | million:millioninchi | milliard:milliarininchi | trilliard:trilliarininchi] ->  ||  _ wnum ord OrdSuffix .#. 
	.o.  [ord OrdSuffix]:0 -> || _ .#.; 




define Translate [ 
 Unit -> || _ wnum | dec | PowerOfThousandSymbol  ,, 
 Unit -> || dp Digit* _ Digit* dec ,,   # right of decimal point
 Teen [teen:0] -> || _ ,, 
 Ten [ten:0] -> || _ ,, 
	Unit [hnd:yuz] -> || _  wnum ,, 
	Unit [hnd:yuzi] -> || _ \wnum  ,, 
	and:0 ->   || _ ,, 
	tenths -> ["butun" "o'ndan"]  || _  ,, 
	hndths ->  ["butun" "yuzdan"]  || _  ,, 
	%, @->  ["o'nlik" "vergul"]  || _ ?+ .#. ,, 
	%. ->  ["kasr" "nuqtazi"] || _ ?+ .#.  
 ]
 .o. [ 
  bir:0 -> || .#. _ yuz ,,
	[thn:ming | mln:million | bln:milliard | tln:trillion] -> || _    ,, 
	[thns:ming | mlns:million | blns:milliard | tlns:trillion] ->  || _  
	]; 

define NumberRules SeparatePowerOfThousand(thns)  .o. 
 SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns)  .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds  .o. 
SeparateTens  .o. 
 MarkTeens  
 .o. InsertAnds 
   .o.  RemoveZeros  .o. 
 PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
 preTranslate
 .o. RemoveBirMing   
 .o. processOrdinals
 .o.  [%.|%,|wnum] -> nol ... || .#. _   # hack to replace lost zero in front of dec. point
 .o. Translate   
.o. processFinalOrdinals
 .o. 	[dp:0|dec:0|wnum:0] -> || _ 
 ;
	


source romans.foma
regex ConvertRomanToDecimal .o. ArabicNumber  .o. tagRules  .o. NumberRules 
 ; 

#source test.data
